District of Columbia statutes.
16-2501

Application; persons who may file.

Whoever, being a resident of the District and desiring a change of name, may file an application in the Superior Court setting forth the reasons therefor and also the name desired to be assumed. If the applicant is an infant, the application shall be filed by his parent, guardian, or next friend.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 595, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 560, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(i)

Cross References

Adopted persons, change of name, see § 16-312.
Superior court, jurisdiction, see § 11-921.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2501.
1973 Ed., § 16-2501.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 20-37 added “or Gender” at the end of the chapter heading.